District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-6107

Loss ratio standards

Repealed.

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-244, § 12, 38 DCR 360
1981 Ed., §§ 35-2201 to 35-2209.
Temporary repeal of chapter: Section 12 of D.C. Law 8-68, effective February 22, 1990, and section 12 of D.C. Law 8-218, effective March 6, 1991, repealed this chapter.